Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1412
Death of defendant in actions to recover real property; against whom action revived.

Upon the death of a defendant in an action for the recovery of real property only, or which concerns only his rights or claims to such property, the action may be revived against his heirs or devisees, or both, and an order therefor may be forthwith made in the manner directed in the preceding sections of this chapter.

R.S.1867, Code § 465, p. 471;

R.S.1913, § 8033;

C.S.1922, § 8974;

C.S.1929, § 20-1412;

R.S.1943, § 25-1412.

If a decree of foreclosure is obtained during the lifetime of the mortgagor, sale and confirmation after his death without revivor is voidable only and not subject to collateral attack. Wendt v. Jones, 145 Neb. 667, 17 N.W.2d 887 (1945).